Massachusetts, session 194th, H2963.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 4 of chapter 32 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the word “be”, in line 148, the following
words:- provided written notice by the retirement board upon entry into service that they are.
SECTION 2. Said section 4 of said chapter 32, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by inserting after the word “member”, in line 151, the following words:- , prior to or
within 1 year of vesting pursuant to this chapter,.
SECTION 3. Section 3 of chapter 71 of the acts of 1996, as amended by section 2 of
chapter 468 of the acts of 2002, is hereby further amended by striking out the second paragraph.
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, any member of
a retirement system who is a member in service and a veteran who failed to make the purchase
of 2

authorized in paragraph (h) of subdivision (1) of section 4 of chapter 32 of the General Laws
within the required 180 days pursuant to chapter 71 of the acts of 1996, as amended, shall be
given a 1-time opportunity to apply to the retirement system to make said purchase within 1 year
from the effective date of this act. Each retirement system shall provide written notice to all
members in service of their potential eligibility for this purchase within 90 days of the effective
date of this act.
of 2